Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Insurance Producers
§ 26-9-225.
Broker and agent license combinations.

The sole relationship between an insurance producer acting in the capacity of a broker and an insurer as to which he is then appointed as an agent, as to transactions arising during the existence of that agency appointment, is that of insurer and agent and not that of insurer and broker.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 186; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-186; W.S. 1977, §

26-9-134

; Laws 1981, ch. 72, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-126; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as § 26-9-126.

§ 26-9-226.
“Controlled business” restrictions.

The commissioner shall not grant, renew, continue or permit to exist any license as an insurance producer if he finds that the license has been or is being used principally for the purpose of writing “controlled business” as follows:

Insurance on his own interests or those of his family or of his employer; or

Insurance or annuity contracts covering himself or members of his family, or the officers, directors, stockholders, partners or employees of a partnership, association or corporation of which he or a member of his family is an officer, director, stockholder, partner, associate or employee.

A license is deemed to have been or intended to be used principally for the purpose of writing controlled business if the commissioner finds that during any twelve (12) month period the aggregate commissions earned from controlled business as specified in this section have exceeded or probably will exceed the aggregate commissions to be earned on other business written by an applicant or licensee during the same period.

If commissions on controlled business transacted by an insurance producer payable in one (1) calendar year exceed the commissions on other insurance business transacted by the licensee and payable in the same year, the receipt of the excess commissions is an unlawful rebate.

This section does not apply to:

Insurance of the interest of:

A motor vehicle sales or financing agency in a motor vehicle it sells or finances;

A real property mortgagee in the mortgaged property.

Credit life insurance and credit disability insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 163; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-163; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

26-9-104

; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as §

26-9-104

.

§ 26-9-227.
Authority under license to transact business; nontransferability.

Any licensee under this chapter may transact business as authorized by the license throughout the state of Wyoming. No city, county or other political subdivision of this state shall require any other or further permit, registration or authority for transactions by the licensee therein.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 176; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-176; W.S. 1977, §

26-9-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

26-9-116

; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as §

26-9-116

.

§ 26-9-228.
Place of business of licensees; display of licenses; records.

Each resident insurance producer shall have and maintain in this state a place of business accessible to the public and in which the licensee principally conducts transactions under his license. The address of the place shall appear upon the license, and the licensee shall promptly notify the commissioner in writing of any change thereof as provided by W.S. 26-9-207(f). Nothing in this section prohibits maintenance of a place of business in the licensee’s residence in this state.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 3.

The insurance producer shall keep at his place of business a complete record of transactions under his license. The record shall show, as to each insurance policy or contract placed by or through the licensee, the names of the insurer and insured, the number, expiration date of, premium payable as to the policy or contract and any other information the commissioner reasonably requires. The insurance producer shall keep the record available for inspection for a period of at least three (3) years after completion of the transactions.

The requirements of subsection (c) of this section are satisfied if the records specified in this section may be obtained immediately from a central storage place, or elsewhere by on line computer terminals located at the licensee’s place of business.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 189; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-189; Laws 1977, ch. 49, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-137; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 108, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

26-9-129

; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2022 ch. 46, § 3, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

repealed former (b), which read, “The licenses of an insurance producer under this chapter shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of business in a part thereof customarily open to the public.”

Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as §

26-9-129

.

§ 26-9-229.
Reporting and accounting for premiums.

Any premiums or return premiums received by an insurance producer are trust funds received in a fiduciary capacity, and the producer, in the regular course of business, shall account for and pay the funds to the insured, insurer or insurance producer entitled thereto.

The licensee shall establish a separate trust account for premiums specified in subsection (a) of this section and shall not use the account for or commingle it with his own funds. He shall maintain an accurate record and itemization of the funds deposited in the account.

Any insurance producer who diverts or appropriates any funds, to which he is not lawfully entitled, to his own use is guilty of embezzlement and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by law.

A limited lines producer for specialty limited lines shall not be required to treat monies collected from customers purchasing additional specialty limited lines insurance as funds received in a fiduciary capacity, provided that:

The charges for specialty limited lines insurance coverage are itemized and ancillary to the principal business transaction; and

The insurer has consented in writing, signed by an officer of the insurer, that premiums need not be segregated from funds received by the producer for the principal business transaction.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 190; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-190; Laws 1977, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-9-138

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-130; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2013 ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as § 26-9-130.

Personal liability of agent. —

Where defendant insurance agent sold plaintiff insurance coverage for plaintiff's aircraft, defendant had a duty to see that the funds solicited from plaintiff were applied to the use for which they were secured. Having so failed, he must personally account for his actions, and failing to show reasonable exercise of such duty, his personal liability is established. He authored and executed the plan which led to his own misfortune, and he cannot be heard to complain that someone else, i.e., the corporations over which he had control, should be made to respond. Preston v. Natrona Serv., 489 P.2d 622,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1971) (decided under prior law).

Measure of damages. —

Where there is no evidence of greater loss sustained by the insured, the measure of damages has been held to be the premiums or assessments paid by the insured with interest thereon. Preston v. Natrona Serv., 489 P.2d 622,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1971) (decided under prior law).

Quoted

in

United States v. Schwab, 88 F. Supp. 2d 1275, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2903 (D. Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation or suspension of insurance agent's license for withholding or misappropriation of premiums, 17 ALR4th 1106.

§ 26-9-230.
Service of process on nonresident producers.

Application for and acceptance of a license as a nonresident insurance producer or surplus lines broker constitutes irrevocable appointment of the commissioner as the attorney of the licensee for the acceptance of service of process issued in this state in any action or proceeding against the licensee arising out of the licensing or any transactions under the license.

Duplicate copies of process shall be served upon the commissioner or other person in apparent charge of his office during his absence, accompanied by payment to the commissioner a process fee as provided in W.S.

26-4-101

. Upon receiving the service the commissioner shall promptly forward a copy thereof by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the nonresident licensee at his business address last of record with the commissioner.

Process served upon the commissioner and copy thereof forwarded as provided in this section for all purposes constitutes personal service thereof upon the licensee.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 194; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-194; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-142; Laws 1981, ch. 72, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

26-9-134

; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as §

26-9-134

.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to appointment of the commissioner as attorney for acceptance of service of process, see §§

26-3-121

,

26-3-122

.

The 2012 amendment,

added “or surplus lines broker” in (a).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-9-231.
Continuing education. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Resident insurance producers, title agents licensed pursuant to W.S.

26-23-318

, adjusters, nonresident adjusters not exempted under subsection (f) of this section, and other resident persons required to be licensed under this chapter shall complete twenty-four (24) classroom hours of continuing education within each two (2) year licensing period. Of the twenty-four (24) hours at least three (3) shall relate to ethical requirements. The requirements of this section do not apply to nonresident insurance producers, those persons who hold licenses for any kinds of insurance for which an examination is not required, nor shall they apply to any such limited or restricted licenses as the commissioner may exempt.

Any person teaching any approved continuing education course or lecturing at any approved seminar shall qualify for the same number of classroom hours granted to the person taking the course or seminar.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

For good cause shown, the commissioner may grant an extension of up to one (1) year to complete the required continuing education.

Every person subject to this section shall furnish, in a form satisfactory to the commissioner, written certification as to the courses, programs or seminars of instruction taken by that person. The certification shall be executed by or on behalf of the sponsoring organization within a fifteen (15) day period following the course, program or seminar. A nonresident adjuster having met the continuing education requirements in his home state is exempt from the provisions of this section. A nonresident adjuster not licensed in his home state is subject to the requirements of this section.

The commissioner is authorized to assess every person subject to this section a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) in addition to the license fee and payable at the time of license renewal, for the support of continuing education. The fee for support of continuing education shall be deposited in the general fund.

Any person failing to submit proof required by rule of the commissioner of having met the requirements of this section and who has not been granted an extension of time within which to comply shall not have his license renewed until the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that he has complied with all requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 166, § 1; 1995, ch. 17, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-141; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2004, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as § 26-9-141.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a), changing continuing education requirements as specified; repealed subsection (d), which formerly read, “Persons licensed between January 1 and June 30 of any year shall complete ten (10) hours of continuing education for that year. Persons licensed between July 1 and December 31 of any year shall complete five (5) hours of continuing education for that year”; in (e), deleted the former first sentence, which read, “Up to five (5) classroom hours may be carried forward to the next year”; in (g), substituted “fee” or “license fee” for “annual fee” and “annual license fee,” and “thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00),” and inserted “and payable at the time of license renewal”; and rewrote (h), which formerly read, “Any person failing to meet the requirements of this section and who has not been granted an extension of time within which to comply, or who has submitted to the commissioner a false or fraudulent certificate of compliance shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, be subject to the suspension of all licenses issued until the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that he has complied with all requirements of this section.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “service representatives” after “W.S.

26-23-318

”; and in (f), substituted “having met the continuing education requirements in his home state” for “required to complete continuing education in his state of domicile” in the second sentence, and substituted “not licensed in his home state” for “domiciled in a state without a continuing education requirement” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (f), substituted “fifteen (15)” for “sixty (60).”

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, by ch. 46, §§ 2, 4, added (j) and (k); and repealed former (g), which read, “The commissioner is authorized to assess every person subject to this section a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) in addition to the license fee and payable at the time of license renewal, for the support of continuing education. The fee for support of continuing education shall be deposited in the general fund.”

§ 26-9-231.
Continuing education. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Resident insurance producers, title agents licensed pursuant to W.S.

26-23-318

, adjusters, nonresident adjusters not exempted under subsection (f) of this section, and other resident persons required to be licensed under this chapter shall complete twenty-four (24) classroom hours of continuing education within each two (2) year licensing period. Of the twenty-four (24) hours at least three (3) shall relate to ethical requirements. The requirements of this section do not apply to nonresident insurance producers, those persons who hold licenses for any kinds of insurance for which an examination is not required, nor shall they apply to any such limited or restricted licenses as the commissioner may exempt.

Any person teaching any approved continuing education course or lecturing at any approved seminar shall qualify for the same number of classroom hours granted to the person taking the course or seminar.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

For good cause shown, the commissioner may grant an extension of up to one (1) year to complete the required continuing education.

Every person subject to this section shall furnish, in a form satisfactory to the commissioner, written certification as to the courses, programs or seminars of instruction taken by that person. The certification shall be executed by or on behalf of the sponsoring organization within a fifteen (15) day period following the course, program or seminar. A nonresident adjuster having met the continuing education requirements in his home state is exempt from the provisions of this section. A nonresident adjuster not licensed in his home state is subject to the requirements of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 4.

Any person failing to submit proof required by rule of the commissioner of having met the requirements of this section and who has not been granted an extension of time within which to comply shall not have his license renewed until the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that he has complied with all requirements of this section.

No person shall act as a continuing education provider in this state unless that person has been granted approval by the commissioner:

A person applying for approval as a continuing education provider shall make application to the department on forms prescribed by the commissioner and pay the fees established in W.S. 26-4-101(a);

A continuing education provider’s approval shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month in which the application is approved in the second year following approval and every two (2) years thereafter the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid;

Once granted approval, a continuing education provider may submit courses for approval by using forms prescribed by the commissioner and paying the fees set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a). Course approvals shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month in which the course is approved in the second year following approval and every two (2) years thereafter the continuation fees set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) are paid.

The commissioner may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside service, for the handling of continuing education providers and courses. If an outside service is employed, all continuing education provider applications, course approval requests and fees shall be remitted to the service provider.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 166, § 1; 1995, ch. 17, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-141; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2004, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 46, §§ 2, 4, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-9-232.
Return of license to commissioner upon expiration; lost or stolen licenses. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 198; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-198; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-146; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

26-9-138

; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 4; repealed by 2022 ch. 46, § 3, effective March 9, 2022.

§ 26-9-233.
Assumed names.

An insurance producer doing business under any name other than the producer’s legal name is required to notify the insurance commissioner prior to using the assumed name.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 26-9-234.
Specialty limited lines producer license.

The commissioner may issue to an applicant a specialty limited lines producer license for the sale, solicitation or delivery of specialty lines insurance where the sale of the product is ancillary to the business of the person offering the product.

Application under this section shall be made in accordance with W.S.

26-9-206

, except business entity applicants applying for a specialty limited lines producer license shall be exempt from providing shareholders, officers and directors information. However, if the business entity derives more than fifty percent (50%) of its revenue from the sale of insurance, information shall be provided for all officers, directors and shareholders of record that have beneficial ownership of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of securities, who are subject to 15 U.S.C. 78p or subsequent similar federal enactment.

An examination is not required for issuance of a specialty limited lines producer license nor is a licensee required to comply with continuing education requirements of W.S

26-9-231

.

A business entity licensed as a specialty limited lines producer shall keep a register of each location at which insurance is offered on the licensed business entity’s behalf.

A business entity licensed as a specialty limited lines producer for specialty limited lines insurance shall submit the register required in subsection (d) of this section within ten (10) days upon request of the commissioner. The registry shall be open to inspection and examination by the commissioner.

A specialty limited lines producer shall not advertise, represent or otherwise hold out the license holder or an endorsee of the license holder as an agent licensed under this chapter unless the entity or individual holds the applicable license.

An endorsee of the specialty limited lines producer that offers and disseminates specialty limited lines insurance on behalf of the licensed business entity and under the direction of a specialty limited lines insurance producer is not required to be individually licensed and is eligible to offer or disseminate specialty limited lines insurance if all of the following apply:

The endorsee is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

The endorsee shall have received a program of instruction or training prior to receiving permission to operate on behalf of the business entity and under the direction of the designated responsible producer. The training materials shall be made available to the commissioner upon request; and

The endorsee’s compensation shall not be based primarily on the placement of the insurance product but the endorsee may receive compensation for activities under the specialty limited lines license which is incidental to their overall compensation.

An endorsee’s authorization to offer or disseminate specialty limited lines insurance shall expire when the endorsee’s employment with or representation of the licensed entity is terminated.

Individuals who offer or disseminate specialty limited lines insurance whose compensation is primarily dependent on the placement of the insurance product shall obtain a specialty limited lines insurance producer license as set forth in this section.

Charges for specialty limited lines insurance may be billed and collected by a specialty limited lines producer. Any charge to the covered person for coverage that is not included in the cost associated with the purchase or lease of the covered product or related services shall be separately itemized on the covered person’s bill. If the insurance coverage is included with the purchase or lease of the covered product or related services the specialty limited lines producer shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the covered person that the insurance coverage is included with the covered product or related services. Specialty limited lines producers that are billing and collecting these charges shall not be required to maintain these funds in a segregated account provided that the specialty limited lines producer is authorized by the insurer to hold these funds in an alternative manner. Specialty limited lines producers may receive compensation for billing and collection services.

The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

To the extent that they are not in conflict with this section, all provisions of the Wyoming Insurance Code apply to licensees under this section.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 123, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-9-235.
Licensing examination review panel.

The commissioner shall review the procedures for administering examinations required by this chapter no less than every three (3) years. The review shall include consideration of employing outside testing services as authorized by W.S. 26-9-205(b).

The commissioner shall establish a review panel consisting of six (6) licensed insurance producers or adjusters to assist in the administration of duties under subsection (a) of this section. Each licensed insurance producer or adjuster shall have been licensed in this state for at least three (3) years immediately prior to appointment. One (1) shall be a life and accident and health producer, one (1) a property and casualty producer, one (1) the producer of a domestic insurer, one (1) a title insurance agent, one (1) a limited lines producer and one (1) an insurance adjuster.

Panel members shall serve four (4) year terms, except that of the initial review panel three (3) members shall serve a term of two (2) years and three (3) members for four (4) years. Initial terms shall commence on August 1, 2017. Any member of the review panel may be removed as provided under W.S.

9-1-202

. Vacancies shall be filled by the commissioner for the unexpired term.

The review panel shall provide the following assistance to the commissioner:

Review general policy concerning the scope, contents, procedure and conduct of examinations to be given by the commissioner for licenses for insurance producers and adjusters;

Review the questions comprising each particular examination;

Review the scope and contents of material furnished examination applicants by the commissioner under W.S.

26-9-205

for the purpose of preparing for an examination;

Review the procedure to be followed in the conduct of examinations, including but not limited to application for examination, frequency and place of examinations and monitoring and safeguarding of examination questions and papers;

Review the value to be allowed for a correct answer to each question in examination grading;

Make any recommendations to the commissioner it deems appropriate, including recommendations regarding the administration of the examination requirements for licensing.

The commissioner, upon application by the panel members, is authorized to reimburse each panel member per diem and mileage expenses, as allowed to state employees, for each day they are actually engaged in the discharge of the panel’s duty.

History.

2017 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 9, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.